California, session 20252026, SB1097.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:(a)The projects listed in subdivision (b) of Section 21080.80 of the Public Resources Code are necessary to achieve the clean energy policy of The 100 Percent Clean Energy Act of 2018 (Chapter 312 of the Statutes of 2018).(b)Application of the substantial evidence standard of review, instead of the fair argument standard, to the review of negative declarations and mitigated negative declarations for projects described in subdivision (b) of Section 21080.80 of the Public Resources Code furthers California’s clean energy and climate goals, and therefore results in the greatest long-term environmental benefits.SEC. 2.SECTION 1. Section 21080.39 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21080.39. (a) This For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions apply:(1) “Reconductoring with advanced conductors” has the same meaning as the term “reconductored with advanced conductors” is used in Section 454.58 of the Public Utilities Code.(2) “Sensitive site” means any of the following areas:(A) The state park system, as described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 5001) of Chapter 1 of Division 5.(B) A wilderness area, as defined in Section 5093.32.(C) A national park.(D) A national monument.(E) A national recreation area.(F) A national wilderness area.(G) Habitat for protected species identified as candidate, sensitive, or species of special status by state or federal agencies, fully protected species, or species protected by the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), or the Native Plant Protection Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1900) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code).(H) Lands with a conservation easement, as defined in Section 815.1 of the Civil Code and recorded as required by Section 815.5 of the Civil Code, unless the project is determined by the lead agency to be consistent with the terms or requirements of the easement.(b) This division does not apply to a project that consists of the inspection, maintenance, repair, restoration, reconditioning, reconductoring with advanced conductors, replacement, or removal of a an existing transmission wire or cable used to conduct electricity or other piece of equipment that is directly attached to the wire or cable and that meets both all of the following requirements:(1) (A)The For a project that is not located on a sensitive site, the project is undertaken entirely within an existing right-of-way.(2) For a project that is located on a sensitive site, the project meets both of the following requirements:(A) The project is undertaken entirely within an existing right-of-way.(B) The project does not increase the footprint of the existing transmission line by more than 10 percent.(3) For a project that is located on a national park, a national monument, a national wilderness area, or a national recreation area, the project meets both of the following requirements: (A) The project is undertaken entirely within an existing right-of-way that has a certified environmental impact report, negative declaration, or mitigated negative declaration.(B) The project does not increase the footprint of the existing transmission line by more than 10 percent.(4) For a project that is located on any of the locations listed in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, that is undertaken within a private right-of-way, the project meets both of the following requirements:(B)For a project undertaken within a private right-of-way, the(A) The project applicant has permission from the each underlying property owner to access the property for the project.(2)(B) The project applicant enters into a legally binding agreement to restore the right-of-way to its condition before the commencement of the project.(b)(c) If the lead agency determines that a project is exempt from this division pursuant to this section, the lead agency shall file a notice of exemption with the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation and with the county clerk in each county in which the project is located in a manner specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21108 or subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21152.(c)For purposes of this section, “reconductoring with advanced conductors” has the same meaning as the term used in subdivision (b) of Section 454.58 of the Public Utilities Code.SEC. 3.Section 21080.80 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21080.80.(a)Notwithstanding Sections 21064 and 21064.5, or any other law, the following terms shall apply for the purposes of this section.(1)“Mitigated negative declaration” means a negative declaration prepared for a project when the initial study has identified potentially significant effects on the environment, but (A) revisions in the project plans or proposals made by, or agreed to by, the applicant before the proposed negative declaration and initial study are released for public review would avoid or mitigate the effects to a point where no significant effect on the environment would occur, as determined by the lead agency based upon substantial evidence in the record, and (B) the lead agency has determined, based upon substantial evidence in the record, that the project, as revised, will not have a significant effect on the environment.(2)“Negative declaration” means a written statement briefly describing the reasons the lead agency has determined, based upon substantial evidence in the record, that the proposed project will not have a significant effect on the environment and does not require the preparation of an environmental impact report.(3)“Significant effect on the environment” means that the public agency has determined, based upon substantial evidence in the record, that the proposed project is more likely than not to have a significant effect on the environment.(b)Notwithstanding Section 21080 or any other provision of this division, this section applies to both of the following:(1)A project to construct a new facility if all of the following conditions are met:(A)The project is one of following project types:(i)A solar photovoltaic or terrestrial wind electrical generating powerplant and any facilities appurtenant thereto. (ii)An energy storage system as defined in Section 2835 of the Public Utilities Code. (iii)A stationary electrical generating powerplant using any source of thermal energy, excluding any powerplant that burns, uses, or relies on fossil or nuclear fuels.(B)The project is not located in any of the following locations:(i)The state park system, as described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 5001) of Chapter 1 of Division 5.(ii)A wilderness area, as defined in Section 5093.32.(iii)A marine protected area, as defined in Section 2852 of the Fish and Game Code.(iv)The national park system, as defined in Section 100102 of Title 54 of the United States Code.(v)A national recreation area.(vi)A national monument.(vii)The national wild and scenic rivers system, as defined in Section 1273 of Title 16 of the United States Code.(viii)Any ecological reserve or wildlife management area acquired and managed by the Department of Fish and Wildlife pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1525) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 1580) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code.(ix)A hazardous waste site that is listed pursuant to Section 65962.5 of the Government Code or a hazardous waste site designated by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 78760) of Chapter 4 of Part 2 of Division 45 of the Health and Safety Code, unless either of the following apply:(I)The site is an underground storage tank site that received a uniform closure letter issued pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 25296.10 of the Health and Safety Code based on closure criteria established by the State Water Resources Control Board for the use proposed by the project. This paragraph does not alter or change the conditions to remove a site from the list of hazardous waste sites listed pursuant to Section 65962.5 of the Government Code.(II)The State Department of Public Health, State Water Resources Control Board, Department of Toxic Substances Control, or a local agency making a determination pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25296.10 of the Health and Safety Code has otherwise determined that the site is suitable for the use proposed by the project.(x)Within a regulatory floodway as determined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency in any official maps published by the Federal Emergency Management Agency, unless the development has received a no-rise certification in accordance with Section 60.3(d)(3) of Title 44 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(xi)Lands under conservation easement.(xii)On, or within a 300-foot radius of, a wetland, as defined in the United States Fish and Wildlife Service Manual, Part 660 FW 2 (June 21, 1993). (xiii)An environmentally sensitive area within the coastal zone, as defined in Section 30107.5. (xiv)Lands identified for protection from development in an adopted natural community conservation plan pursuant to the Natural Community Conservation Planning Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), adopted habitat conservation plan pursuant to the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), or other natural resource protection plan adopted by the city, county, or city and county.(xv)Within a very high fire hazard severity zone, as determined by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code, or within the state responsibility area, as defined in Section 4102. This subdivision does not apply to sites that have adopted fire hazard mitigation measures pursuant to existing building standards or state fire mitigation measures applicable to the development, including, but not limited to, standards established under all of the following provisions or their successor provisions:(I)Section 4291 of this code or Section 51182 of the Government Code, as applicable. (II)Section 4290. (III)Part 7 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.(xvi)Either prime farmland or farmland of statewide importance, as defined pursuant to the United States Department of Agriculture land inventory and monitoring criteria, as modified for California, and designated on the maps prepared by the Farmland Mapping and Monitoring Program of the Department of Conservation, or land zoned or designated for agricultural protection or preservation by a local ballot measure that was approved by the voters of that jurisdiction.(2)An overhead electrical transmission line carrying electricity from a facility described in clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) that is located within the state to a point of junction with any interconnected electrical transmission system, if all of the following conditions are met:(A)Any portion of the project that is located within a high fire threat district designated a tier 2 or tier 3 fire threat area, as determined by the Public Utilities Commission, complies with the requirements set forth in General Order No. 95 of the Public Utilities Commission.(B)The project does not include construction that physically disturbs any of the following lands:(i)A hazardous waste site that is listed pursuant to Section 65962.5 of the Government Code or a hazardous waste site designated by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 78760) of Chapter 4 of Part 2 of Division 45 of the Health and Safety Code, unless either of the following apply:(I)The site is an underground storage tank site that received a uniform closure letter issued pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 25296.10 of the Health and Safety Code based on closure criteria established by the State Water Resources Control Board for the use proposed by the project. This paragraph does not alter or change the conditions to remove a site from the list of hazardous waste sites listed pursuant to Section 65962.5 of the Government Code.(II)The State Department of Public Health, State Water Resources Control Board, Department of Toxic Substances Control, or a local agency making a determination pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25296.10 of the Health and Safety Code has otherwise determined that the site is suitable for the use proposed by the project.(ii)Within a regulatory floodway as determined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency in any official maps published by the Federal Emergency Management Agency, unless the development has received a no-rise certification in accordance with Section 60.3(d)(3) of Title 44 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(iii)On, or within a 300-foot radius of, a wetland, as defined in the United States Fish and Wildlife Service Manual, Part 660 FW 2 (June 21, 1993).(iv)Within an environmentally sensitive area within the coastal zone, as defined in Section 30107.5.(v)Lands under conservation easement for preservation as wildlife habitat or for open-space purposes.(c)(1)Notwithstanding Section 21080 or any other provision of this division, for purposes of this section, if a lead agency determines that a proposed project, not otherwise exempt from this division, would not have a significant effect on the environment, the lead agency shall adopt a negative declaration to that effect. The negative declaration shall be prepared for the proposed project in either of the following circumstances:(A)The lead agency determines, based upon substantial evidence, in light of the whole record before the lead agency, that the project will not have a significant effect on the environment.(B)An initial study identifies potentially significant effects on the environment, but (i) revisions in the project plans or proposals made by, or agreed to by, the applicant before the proposed negative declaration and initial study are released for public review would avoid the effects or mitigate the effects to a point where no significant effect on the environment would occur, as determined by the public agency based upon substantial evidence on the record, and (ii) the lead agency has determined, based upon substantial evidence, in light of the whole record before the lead agency, that the project, as revised, will not have a significant effect on the environment.(2)If the lead agency determines, based upon substantial evidence, in light of the whole record before the lead agency, that it is more likely than not that the project will have a significant effect on the environment, an environmental impact report shall be prepared.(d)Notwithstanding Section 21082.2, for purposes of this section, all of the following shall apply:(1)The lead agency shall determine whether a project is more likely than not to have a significant effect on the environment based on substantial evidence in light of the whole record.(2)The existence of public controversy over the environmental effects of a project shall not require preparation of an environmental impact report if an environmental impact report would not otherwise be required by this division.(3)If the lead agency determines, based upon substantial evidence, in light of the whole record before the lead agency, that it is more likely than not that a project will have a significant effect on the environment, an environmental impact report shall be prepared.(4)Statements in an environmental impact report and comments with respect to an environmental impact report shall not be deemed determinative of whether the project may have a significant effect on the environment.(e)(1)For purposes of this section, substantial evidence includes fact, a reasonable assumption predicated upon fact, or expert opinion supported by fact.(2)Substantial evidence is not argument, speculation, unsubstantiated opinion or narrative, evidence that is clearly inaccurate or erroneous, or evidence of social or economic impacts that do not contribute to, or are not caused by, physical impacts on the environment.(f)As a result of the public review process for a mitigated negative declaration, including administrative decisions and public hearings, the lead agency may conclude that certain mitigation measures identified pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) are infeasible or otherwise undesirable. Under those circumstances, the lead agency, before approving the project, may delete those mitigation measures and substitute for them other mitigation measures that the lead agency finds, based upon substantial evidence in the record, after holding a public hearing on the matter, are equivalent or more effective in mitigating significant effects on the environment to a less than significant level and that do not cause any potentially significant effect on the environment. If those new mitigation measures are made conditions of project approval or are otherwise made part of the project approval, the deletion of the former measures and the substitution of the new mitigation measures shall not constitute an action or circumstance requiring recirculation of the mitigated negative declaration.(g)This section does not preclude a project applicant or any other person from challenging, in an administrative or judicial proceeding, the legality of a condition of project approval imposed by the lead agency. If, however, any condition of project approval set aside by either an administrative body or court was necessary to avoid or lessen the likelihood of the occurrence of a significant effect on the environment, the lead agency’s approval of the negative declaration and project shall be invalid and a new environmental review process shall be conducted before the project can be reapproved, unless the lead agency substitutes a new condition that the lead agency finds, after holding a public hearing on the matter, is equivalent to, or more effective in, lessening or avoiding significant effects on the environment and that does not cause any potentially significant effect on the environment.(h)The provisions of this division, except for Sections 21064, 21064.5, 21080, and 21080.2, shall apply to the review of a negative declaration or mitigated negative declaration for a project described in subdivision (b) to the extent not inconsistent with this section or with the application of the substantial evidence standard of review.(i)An action or proceeding brought to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul the adoption of a negative declaration or mitigated negative declaration subject to this chapter or the granting of any project approvals, including any potential appeals to the court of appeal or the Supreme Court, shall be resolved, to the extent feasible, within 270 days of the filing of the certified record of proceedings with the court.SEC. 4.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.